Maryland, session 2025, HB1342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
SUBTITLE 11. STATE–OWNED PROPERTY.
5–1101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1342*

HOUSE BILL 1342
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AESTHETIC PESTICIDE” INCLUDES ANY CHEMICAL USED TO CONTROL
PESTS, INCLUDING PESTICIDES, INSECTICIDES, AND HERBICIDES.
(C) “INVASIVE SPECIES” MEANS A PLANT, AN ANIMAL, A MICROBE, OR A
PARASITE THAT IS NOT NATIVE TO THE STATE AND MAY CAUSE HARM TO THE
ENVIRONMENT, ECONOMY, OR HUMAN HEALTH AS A RESULT OF ITS NONNATIVE
CHARACTERISTICS.
(D) “LISTED PESTICIDE” MEANS A PESTICIDE:
(1) OF WHICH THE ACTIVE INGREDIENTS ARE RECOMMENDED BY THE
NATIONAL ORGANIC STANDARDS BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH 7 U.S.C. § 6518, AS
AMENDED, AND PUBLISHED ON THE NATIONAL LIST CONTAINED AT 7 C.F.R. §§
205.601 AND 205.602; OR
(2) A PESTICIDE DESIGNATED AS A “MINIMUM RISK PESTICIDE”
UNDER THE FEDERAL INSECTICIDE, FUNGICIDE, AND RODENTICIDE ACT.
(E) “PESTICIDE” MEANS A SUBSTANCE OR MIXTURE OF SUBSTANCES
INTENDED TO BE USED:
(1) TO PREVENT, DESTROY, OR MITIGATE ANY PEST;
(2) AS A PLANT REGULATOR, DEFOLIANT, OR DESICCANT; OR
(3) AS A SPRAY ADJUVANT TO ENHANCE THE PERFORMANCE OF A
PESTICIDE MIXTURE.
(F) “REGISTERED PESTICIDE” MEANS A PESTICIDE REGISTERED BY THE
U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY AND LABELED FOR USE IN LAWN,
GARDEN, OR ORNAMENTAL SITES OR AREAS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE FEDERAL
INSECTICIDE, FUNGICIDE, AND RODENTICIDE ACT.
(G) “WEED” MEANS ANY PLANT OR PLANT PART THAT GROWS WHERE IT IS
NOT WANTED.
5–1102.
(A) A PERSON MAY APPLY A PESTICIDE ON STATE–OWNED PROPERTY ONLY
IF THE PERSON IS APPLYING:

HOUSE BILL 1342 3
(1) A LISTED PESTICIDE; OR
(2) A REGISTERED PESTICIDE FOR THE PURPOSE OF:
(I) WEED MANAGEMENT;
(II) CONTROLLING AN INVASIVE SPECIES;
(III) CONTROLLING DISEASE VECTORS;
(IV) CONTROLLING BITING OR STINGING INSECTS;
(V) CONTROLLING STINGING PLANTS;
(VI) PROPERTY MAINTENANCE BY A PUBLIC UTILITY
CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ANY APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
VEGETATION MANAGEMENT REQUIREMENT;
(VII) CONTROLLING INDOOR PESTS, IF APPLIED AROUND OR
NEAR THE FOUNDATION OF A BUILDING;
(VIII) CONTROLLING PESTS WHILE ENGAGED IN AGRICULTURE;
OR
(IX) CONTROLLING A PEST OUTBREAK THAT POSES AN
IMMINENT THREAT TO HUMAN HEALTH OR HAS THE POTENTIAL TO CAUSE
SIGNIFICANT ECONOMIC DAMAGE IF A REGISTERED PESTICIDE IS NOT USED.
(B) A PERSON WHO APPLIES A PESTICIDE FOR A PURPOSE IDENTIFIED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2)(IX) OF THIS SECTION SHALL, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE
APPLICATION, NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE PESTICIDE APPLICATION AND THE
REASONS FOR USE.
5–1103.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A MODEL PESTICIDE AND
POLLINATOR HABITAT MANAGEMENT PLAN TO BE IMPLEMENTED ON STATE–OWNED
AND MANAGED PROPERTY.
(2) FOR EACH INDIVIDUAL TRACT OF STATE–OWNED PROPERTY, THE
UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT THAT MANAGES THE TRACT SHALL WORK WITH THE

HOUSE BILL 1342
DEPARTMENT TO ADAPT THE MODEL PESTICIDE AND POLLINATOR HABITAT
MANAGEMENT PLAN TO MEET THE SPECIFIC NEEDS OF THE INDIVIDUAL TRACT.
(B) (1) THE MODEL PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL:
(I) DESIGNATE AT LEAST 20% OF THE UNENCUMBERED LAND
AS AREA THAT MAY NOT BE TREATED BY ANY AESTHETIC PESTICIDE;
(II) PROHIBIT THE USE OF PESTICIDES UNLESS THE USE IS
AUTHORIZED UNDER § 5–1102(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) PROHIBIT THE USE OF ANY PESTICIDE KNOWN TO BE TOXIC
TO POLLINATORS, EVEN IF THE PESTICIDE IS A LISTED PESTICIDE, UNLESS THE
SECRETARY DETERMINES THAT THE USE IS NECESSARY TO RESPOND TO A SPECIFIC
INSTANCE OF THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH;
(IV) IMPLEMENT BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES OUTLINED IN
THE DEPARTMENT’S MANAGED POLLINATOR PROTECTION PLAN FOR THE
DESIGNATION, MAINTENANCE, CREATION, ENHANCEMENT, AND RESTORATION OF
POLLINATOR HABITAT AREAS;
(V) BE AT LEAST AS PROTECTIVE OF POLLINATORS AS THE
DEPARTMENT’S MANAGED POLLINATOR PROTECTION PLAN; AND
(VI) WHEN PRACTICABLE, PRIORITIZE THE USE OF NATIVE
PLANTS TO CREATE HABITATS FOR KEY POLLINATORS.
(2) THE MODEL PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF
THIS SECTION MAY NOT REQUIRE AN ACTION ON LAND THAT IS INCONSISTENT WITH
ANY FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL REQUIREMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.